trunk/incubator/da.newdic.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="m/and__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anden</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ader__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aderen</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ader</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="snab/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="treer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sodavand__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e(r)ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/od__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødderne</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødder</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oden</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paranød__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ag/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eren</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lag/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nerne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>net</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="croupier__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="brud__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="portræt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alt/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>(e)ret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jordbær__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="uge__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
